Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
SUBPART 2
ADMINISTRATIVE DISSOLUTION

7-56-710. Grounds for administrative dissolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 529, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(b) amended, p. 951, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(b), (1)(c), and (1)(d) amended, p. 2233, § 104, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1419, § 61, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1218, § 26, effective October 1.

7-56-711. Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 529, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) to (5) amended, p. 2233, § 105, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1218, § 26, effective October 1.

7-56-712. Reinstatement following administrative dissolution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 530, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(c) amended, p. 951, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1819, § 31, effective July 1; IP(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 1684, § 29, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 1419, § 62, effective July 1.

7-56-713. Appeal from denial of reinstatement. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 531, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section repealed, p. 1420, § 63, effective July 1.